Hawaii statutes.
§323D-14 Functions; statewide health
coordinating council. The statewide council shall:

(1) Prepare and revise as necessary the state health
services and facilities plan;

(2) Advise the state agency on actions under section
323D-12;

(3) Appoint the review panel pursuant to section
323D-42; and

(4) Review and comment upon the following actions by
the state agency before such actions are made final:

(A) The making of findings as to applications
for certificate of need; and

(B) The making of findings as to the
appropriateness of those institutional and noninstitutional health services
offered in the State. [L 1975, c 159, pt of §2; am L 1977, c 178, pt of §2; am
L 1980, c 75, §5; am L 1982, c 245, §5; am L 1984, c 267, §6; am L 1987, c 270,
§6; am L 1997, c 336, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next